Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 70.
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT AND GENERAL ASSEMBLY SALARIES — RESTRICTIONS ON EXPENSE REIMBURSEMENTS (CONST. AMEND. 56, §§ 2, 3 REPEALED; AND SECTIONS ADDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by H.J.R. 1018 during the 1991 Regular Session and adopted at the 1992 general election by a vote of 464,901 for and 305,161 against.

§ 1. Executive Department and General Assembly — Restrictions on reimbursements.

No official of the Executive Department shall be reimbursed by the State of Arkansas for any expenses except those reasonably connected to their official duties and only if such reimbursement is made for documented expenses actually incurred and from the regular budget appropriated for the official’s office. Such restrictions on expense reimbursement are of a general application and also are intended specifically to prohibit the appropriation and use of public relations funds. Except as provided in this Constitution, such officials of the Executive Department shall not receive any other income from the State of Arkansas, whether in the form of salaries or expenses.

Except as provided in this Constitution, no member of the General Assembly shall receive any other income for service in the General Assembly, whether in the form of salaries or expenses, including, but not limited to, public relations funds. Provided further, that no member of the General Assembly shall be entitled to per diem unless authorized by law, or to reimbursement for expenses or mileage unless authorized by law, documented, and reasonably related to their official duties. [As amended by Const. Amend. 94.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 94, which amended this section effective November 5, 2014, was proposed by H.J.R. 1009 during the 2013 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2014 general election by a vote of 428,206 for and 388,459 against. The amendment deleted the third sentence of (a) and the first sentence of (b), which specified annual salary amounts; and substituted “in this Constitution” for “herein” twice.

§ 2. Additional Constitutional amendments authorized.

In addition to the three amendments to the Constitution allowed pursuant to Article 19, § 22, either branch of the General Assembly at a regular session thereof may propose an amendment to the Constitution to change the salaries for the offices of Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, Secretary of State, Treasurer of State, Commissioner of State Lands, and Auditor of State and for members of the General Assembly. If the same be agreed to by a majority of all members elected to each house, such proposed amendment shall be entered on the journals with the yeas and nays, and published in at least one newspaper in each county, where a newspaper is published, for six months immediately preceding the next general election for Senators and Representatives, at which time the same shall be submitted to the electors of the State for approval or rejection. If a majority of the electors voting at such election adopt the amendment the same shall become a part of this Constitution. Only one amendment to the Constitution may be referred pursuant to this section.

Cross References.

Constitutional amendments, Art. Const., Art. 19, § 22.

§ 3. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 94, which repealed this section effective November 5, 2014, was proposed by H.J.R. 1009 during the 2013 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2014 general election by a vote of 428,206 for and 388,459 against.

Before repeal, this section read:

“§ 3. Salary adjustments.

“The salaries of the Executive Department officials and members of the General Assembly provided for in Section 1 or 2 of this amendment or adjusted pursuant to this section may be increased annually through subsequent appropriations by the General Assembly by an amount not to exceed the average percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers or its successor, as published by the United States Department of Labor, for the two years immediately preceding the year of the salary appropriation.”

For current provision concerning salaries, see Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 31.

§ 4. Effective date.

The provisions of this amendment shall be effective on January 1, 1993.

§ 5. Repeal of Amendment 56, Sections 2 and 3.

Section 2 and Section 3 of Amendment 56 to the Arkansas Constitution are hereby repealed.